Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4224.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to promote the safety, welfare, and educational interests of the people of this state by regulating the construction, reconstruction, and remodeling of, and the installation of certain security devices and certain systems at, certain public or private school buildings or additions to those buildings and by regulating the construction, reconstruction, and remodeling of, and the installation of certain security devices and certain systems at, buildings leased or acquired for school purposes; to define the class of buildings affected by this act; to prescribe the powers and duties of certain state agencies and officials; to provide for the establishment of safety guidelines for certain public and private school buildings; to prescribe penalties for the violation of this act; and to repeal acts and parts of acts. Sec. 1e. (1) If an existing school building does not have an emergency responder radio coverage system that operates and integrates with this state's public safety communications system before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, then the administrative authority of the school building shall, not later than 10 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, install in each school building an emergency responder radio coverage system that operates and integrates with this state's public safety communications system. (2) The administrative authority of a school building shall coordinate with the department of technology, management, and budget, the public safety communications interoperability board, the Michigan state police, and local first responders in the installation of the emergency responder radio coverage system required under subsection (1) in the school building to ensure the interoperability of that emergency responder radio with local and state authorities and first responders. The department of technology, management, and budget and the public safety communications interoperability board are responsible for coordinating with wireless service providers to integrate wireless public safety broadband solutions with this state's public safety communications system. (3) The emergency responder radio coverage system required under subsection (1) must comply with the minimum signal strength established under and based on the existing coverage levels of the public safety communication system utilized by the jurisdiction measured at the exterior of the school building and must be receivable and transmittable from all areas within the school building. The emergency responder radio coverage system required under subsection (1) must be evaluated with a test before being installed, tested, or maintained in accordance with all of the following: (a) The state construction code promulgated by the state construction code commission under section 4 of the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1504, or a part of that code of limited application, including any modification of or amendment to the code. (b) The fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.1 to 29.33. (c) The International Fire Code or the National Fire Protection Life Safety Code. (4) As used in this section, "administrative authority of a school building" means the superintendent, principal chief administrative officer, or other person having supervisory authority of a school building. Sec. 3a. (1) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the bureau of construction codes, after consultation with the school safety and mental health commission created under section 1308h of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1308h, the state fire marshal, and the Michigan state police, shall establish safety guidelines to assist schools with procedures for the lockdown of a school building during a credible school safety threat. The guidelines established under this section must include, but are not limited to, 1 of the following: (a) The impact of this state's fire and building codes on lockdown and evacuation procedures. (b) The removal of a manual fire alarm box from a vestibule at the entrance of a school. (2) The safety guidelines developed under subsection (1) must comply with this act, the Stille-DeRossett-Hale single state construction code act, 1972 PA 230, MCL 125.1501 to 125.1531, and the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.1 to 29.33. (3) The bureau of construction codes shall do all of the following: (a) Ensure that the safety guidelines are easily accessible and publicly available on its website. (b) Send a copy of the safety guidelines to all school districts and law enforcement agencies in this state. (c) Review and update the safety guidelines as it considers necessary. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. ____ (request no. H00074'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.